District of Columbia statutes.
22-3571.02

Applicability of fine proportionality provision.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a sentence to pay a fine under § 22-3571.01 shall be subject to the following:

(1)

If a law setting forth the penalty for such an offense specifies a maximum fine that is lower than the fine otherwise applicable under § 22-3571.01 and such law, by specific reference, exempts the offense from the applicability of the fine otherwise applicable under § 22-3571.01, the defendant may not be fined more than the maximum amount specified in the law setting forth the penalty for the offense.

(2)

If a law setting forth the penalty for such an offense specifies a maximum fine that is higher than the fine otherwise applicable under § 22-3571.01 and such law, by specific reference, exempts the offense from the applicability of the fine otherwise applicable under § 22-3571.01, the defendant may be fined the maximum amount specified in the law setting forth the penalty for the offense.

(3)

If a law setting forth the penalty for such an offense specifies no fine and such law, by specific reference, does not exempt the offense from the fine otherwise applicable under § 22-3571.01, the defendant may be fined pursuant to § 22-3571.01.

(b)

(1)

If any person derives pecuniary gain from such an offense, or if the offense results in pecuniary loss to a person other than the defendant, the defendant may be fined not more than the greater of twice the gross gain or twice the gross loss.

(2)

The court may impose a fine under this subsection in excess of the fine provided for by § 22-3571.01 only to the extent that the pecuniary gain or loss is both alleged in the indictment or information and is proven beyond a reasonable doubt.

(c)

[This chapter and the provisions of D.C. Law 19-317] shall not apply to any provision of Title 11 of the District of Columbia Official Code.

June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 102, 60 DCR 2064
This section is referenced in § 22-3571.01.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 102 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.